Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Article 5. Enforcement of Support Order Without Registration.

Sec. 25.25.501.
Employer’s receipt of income withholding order of another state.

An income withholding order issued in another state may be sent by or on behalf of the obligee, or by the support enforcement agency, to the person defined as the obligor’s employer under AS 25.27 without first filing a complaint or comparable pleading or registering the order with a tribunal of this state.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995; am § 60 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 69 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, substituted “sent by or on behalf of the obligee, or by the support enforcement agency, to the person” for “sent to the person or entity”.

Sec. 25.25.502.
Employer’s compliance with income withholding order of another state.

Upon receipt of an order under AS

25.25.501

, the obligor’s employer shall immediately provide a copy of the order to the obligor.

The employer shall treat an income withholding order issued in another state that appears regular on its face as if it were issued by a tribunal of this state.

Except as provided by (d) of this section and AS

25.25.503

, the employer shall withhold and distribute the funds as directed in the withholding order by complying with the terms of the order, as applicable, that specify

the duration and the amount of periodic payments of current child support, stated as a sum certain;

the person designated to receive payments and the address to which the payments are to be forwarded;

medical support, whether in the form of periodic cash payment, stated as a sum certain, or an order to the obligor to provide health insurance coverage for the child under a policy available through the obligor’s employment;

the amount of periodic payments of fees and costs for a support enforcement agency, the issuing tribunal, and the obligee’s attorney, stated as sums certain; and

the amount of periodic payments of arrearages and interest on arrearages, stated as sums certain.

The employer shall comply with the law of the state of the obligor’s principal place of employment for withholding from income with respect to

the employer’s fee for processing an income withholding order;

the maximum amount permitted to be withheld from the obligor’s income; and

the time periods within which the employer must implement the withholding order and forward the child support payment.

History.

(§ 6 ch 57 SLA 1995; am § 61 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 70 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Administrative Code. —

For administrative enforcement — income withholding, see 15 AAC 125, art. 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (c)(2), deleted “or agency” following “the person”.

Sec. 25.25.503.
Employer’s compliance with two or more income withholding orders.

If an obligor’s employer receives two or more orders to withhold support from the earnings of the same obligor, the employer shall be considered to have satisfied the terms of the orders if the employer complies with the law of the state of the obligor’s principal place of employment to establish the priorities for withholding and allocating income withheld for two or more child support obligees.

History.

(§ 62 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 71 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Administrative Code. —

For administrative enforcement — income withholding, see 15 AAC 125, art. 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, substituted “child support obligees” for “child support orders” at the end, and made stylistic changes.

Sec. 25.25.504.
Immunity from civil liability.

An employer that complies with an income withholding order issued in another state in accordance with AS

25.25.501

—

25.25.505

is not subject to civil liability to an individual or agency with regard to the employer’s withholding of child support from the obligor’s income.

History.

(§ 62 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 72 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, substituted “An employer that” for “An employer who” at the beginning.

Sec. 25.25.505.
Penalties for noncompliance.

An employer that wilfully fails to comply with an income withholding order issued in another state and received for enforcement is subject to the same penalties that may be imposed for noncompliance with an order issued by a tribunal of this state.

History.

(§ 62 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 73 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, substituted “An employer that” for “An employer who” at the beginning, and made a stylistic change.

Sec. 25.25.506.
Contest by obligor.

An obligor may contest the validity or enforcement of an income withholding order issued in another state and received directly by an employer in this state by registering the order in a tribunal of this state and filing a contest to that order as provided in AS

25.25.601

—

25.25.616

or otherwise contesting the order in the same manner as if the order were issued by a tribunal of this state. The provisions of AS

25.25.604

apply to the contest.

The obligor shall give notice of the contest to

a support enforcement agency providing services to the obligee;

each employer that has directly received an income withholding order relating to the obligor; and

if

a person is designated to receive payments in the income withholding order, to that person; or

no person is designated to receive payments in the income withholding order, to the obligee.

History.

(§ 62 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 74 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (a), inserted “by registering the order in a tribunal of this state and filing a contest to that order as provided in AS

25.25.601

—

25.25.616

or otherwise contesting the order” following “an employer in this state”; in (b), in (b)(2), inserted “relating to the obligor” following “income withholding order”, in (b)(3), deleted “or an agency” or similar, following “person” three times.

Sec. 25.25.507.
Administrative enforcement of orders.

A party or support enforcement agency seeking to enforce a support order or an income withholding order, or both, issued in another state or a foreign support order may send the documents required for registering the order to the child support services agency of this state.

Upon receipt of the documents, the child support services agency, without initially seeking to register the order, shall consider and, if appropriate, use any administrative procedure authorized by the law of this state to enforce a support order or an income withholding order, or both. If the obligor does not contest administrative enforcement, the order need not be registered. If the obligor contests the validity or administrative enforcement of the order, the child support services agency shall register the order under this chapter.

History.

(§ 62 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 75 ch 32 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency” was changed to “child support services agency” in this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For administrative enforcement — income withholding, see 15 AAC 125, art. 6.

For administrative actions under the uniform interstate family support act, see 15 AAC 125, art. 9.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (a), inserted “or support enforcement agency” following “A party” at the beginning, substituted “in another state or a foreign support order” for “by a tribunal of another state” preceding “may send the documents”.